sv: Skenstil: A-frame; Bänk/box; C-rail; Dubbelrör; Nedåtlutande skena; Trappräcke; Kinkad; I flera nivåer; Rainbow; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบของราว: ทรง A-frame; ม้านั่ง/กล่อง; ราวตัว C; บาร์คู่; ราวขาลง; ราวจับ; หักมุม; หลายระดับ; ทรงสายรุ้ง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 滑杆样式: A 形; 长椅/箱体; C 形栏; 双杆; 下坡栏; 扶手; 弯折栏; 多层; 彩虹栏; 其他
ru: Стиль рейла: А-образный; Скамья/бокс; С-образный; Двойная труба; Наклонный; Перила; С изломом (кинковый); Многоуровневый; Радуга; Другое
nl: Rail stijl: A-frame; Bank/box; C-rail; Dubbele stang; Downrail; Leuning; Geknikt; Meerdere niveaus; Regenboog; Overig
pt-PT: Estilo do trilho: Estrutura em A; Banco/caixa; Calha em C; Barra dupla; Calha a descer; Corrimão; Com desnível; Vários níveis; Arco-íris; Outro
it: Stile ringhiera: Profilo ad A; Bench/box; C-rail; Doppia barra; Down rail; Corrimano; Kinked; Multilivello; Rainbow; Altro
sl-SI: Slog tirnice: A-okvir; Klop/škatla; C-prečka; Dvojna palica; Nagnjena prečka; Ograjna prečka; Prelomljena; Večnivojska; Mavrica; Drugo
es: Estilo de riel: Armazón en A; Banco/Caja; Barra en C; Barra doble; Barra descendente; Pasamanos; Acodada; Multinivel; Arcoíris; Otro
lt-LT: Bėgelio stilius: A formos rėmas; Suolelis / dėžė; C formos bėgis; Dvigubas strypas; Nusileidžiantis bėgis; Turėklas; Laužytas; Daugiapakopis; Vaivorykštė; Kita
hu: Sín stílusa: A-alakú; Pad/doboz; C-sín; Dupla rúd; Lejtős sín; Korlát; Tört; Többszintes; Szivárvány; Egyéb
ko: 레일 방식: A-프레임; 벤치/박스; C-레일; 더블 바; 다운 레일; 핸드레일; 킹크; 다층; 레인보우; 기타
pt-BR: Rail estilo: Estrutura em A; Banco/caixa; Trilho em C; Barra dupla; Trilho descendente; Corrimão; Kinked; Multinível; Arco-íris; Outros
sk-SK: Štýl držiaka: A-rám; Lavička/box; C-rail; Dvojitá tyč; Zjazdový rail; Zábradlie; Zalomený; Viacúrovňový; Dúhový; Iné
fr: Forme du rail: En A; Banc/boîte; Rail en C; Barre double; Rail descendant; Rampe; Coudé; Niveaux multiples; Arc-en-ciel; Autre
en: Rail style: A-frame; Bench/Box; C-rail; Double bar; Down rail; Handrail; Kinked; Multi-level; Rainbow; Other
ja: レールスタイル: Aフレーム; ベンチ/ボックス; Cレール; ダブルバー; ダウンレール; ハンドレール; キンク; マルチレベル; レインボー; その他
hr-HR: Željeznički stil: A-okvir; Klupa/kutija; C-profil; Dvostruka šipka; Donja šipka; Rukohvat; Prelomljena; U više razina; Duga; Ostalo
zh-TW: 導軌樣式: A 字架; 長椅/箱型; C 型軌道; 雙桿; 下坡軌道; 扶手階梯; 彎折軌道; 多層軌道; 彩虹軌道; 其他
tr: Ray stili: A çerçeve; Bank/Kutu; C ray; Çift çubuk; Aşağı ray; Tırabzan; Kıvrımlı; Çok seviyeli; Gökkuşağı; Diğer
nb: Skinnestil: A-ramme; Benk/boks; C-rail; Dobbel stang; Down-rail; Rekkverk; Kinked; Flernivå; Regnbue; Annet
bg-BG: Стил на релсата: A-образна; Пейка/кутия; C-образна; Двойна тръба; Низходяща; Парапет; Пречупена; На няколко нива; Дъга; Други
el: Στιλ ράγας: Σε σχήμα Α; Πάγκος/Κουτί; Ράγα σχήματος C; Διπλή μπάρα; Καθοδική ράγα; Κουπαστή; Σπαστή; Πολλαπλών επιπέδων; Ουράνιο τόξο; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu đường ray: Khung chữ A; Dạng ghế dài/hộp; Thanh ray chữ C; Thanh đôi; Thanh ray nghiêng xuống; Tay vịn; Dạng gập khúc; Nhiều tầng; Cầu vồng; Khác
de: Rail-Stil: A-Frame; Bench/Box; C-Rail; Doppelstange; Down-Rail; Handlauf; Kinked; Mehrstufig; Rainbow; Sonstige
cs: Styl montážní lišty: Tvar A; Lavička/box; C-rail; Dvojitá trubka; Šikmá (down rail); Zábradlí (handrail); Zalomená (kinked); Víceúrovňová; Duha (rainbow); Ostatní
pl: Styl szynowy: A-frame; Ławka/Box; C-rail; Podwójna rurka; Down rail; Handrail; Kinked; Wielopoziomowa; Tęcza (rainbow); Inne
fi: Reilin malli: A-kisko; Penkki/laatikko; C-kisko; Kaksoistanko; Laskukisko; Käsijohde; Taitettu; Monitasoinen; Sateenkaari; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul șinei: Formă de A; Bancă/cutie; Bară în C; Bară dublă; Bară descendentă; Balustradă; Curbată; Cu mai multe niveluri; Curcubeu; Altele
da: Skinnestil: A-frame; Bænk/boks; C-rail; Dobbelt bar; Down-rail; Gelænder; Kinked; I flere niveauer; Rainbow; Andet